Utah statutes.
53A-3-423.   Process and content standards for policy.

(1)  "Policy" as used in this section means the elementary and secondary school online access policy adopted by a local school board to meet the requirements of Section 53A-3-422.

(2) (a)  Each policy shall be developed under the direction of the local school board, adopted in an open meeting, and have an effective date.  The local school board shall review the policy at least every three years, and a footnote shall be added to the policy indicating the effective date of the last review.

(b)  Notice of the availability of the policy shall be posted in a conspicuous place within each school.  The local school board may issue any other public notice it considers appropriate.

(3)  The policy shall:

(a)  state that it restricts access to Internet or online sites that contain obscene material and shall state how the local school board intends to meet the requirements of Section 53A-3-422;

(b)  inform the public that administrative procedures and guidelines for the staff to follow in enforcing the policy have been adopted and are available for review at the school; and

(c)  inform the public that procedures to handle complaints about the policy, its enforcement, or about observed behavior have been adopted and are available for review at the school.



Enacted by Chapter 172, 2001 General Session

